Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2298.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 36.22 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) Each county auditor is authorized to develop and implement a voluntary property title protection program to prevent land record fraud. A county auditor may coordinate with the county treasurer or excise agent in developing the program.(b) A voluntary property title protection program may give property owners the option to record with the county auditor a property fraud protection instrument in order to prohibit the recording of any transfer of ownership of that property without the use of a secure personal identification number, an approved override process, or until a release of fraud protection instrument for the same property is recorded. The program must allow for an emergency override process through verified court orders or authorized legal representative actions.(2) If a county auditor receives any instrument transferring ownership of real property for which a fraud protection instrument has been recorded, the auditor may delay the recording of such instrument or entering of such instrument on the transfer record for up to five business days.(3) A county treasurer, or excise agent, may delay processing a real estate excise tax refund application for up to 5 days if the property for which the refund application is submitted is the subject of a recorded fraud protection instrument.Sec. 2. RCW 65.04.030 and 1996 c 229 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The auditor or recording officer must, upon the payment of the fees as required in RCW 36.18.010 for the same, acknowledge receipt therefor in writing or printed form and record in large and well bound books, or by photographic, photomechanical, electronic format, or other approved process, the following:(1) Deeds, grants and transfers of real property, mortgages and releases of mortgages of real estate, instruments or agreements relating to community or separate property, powers of attorney to convey real estate, and leases which have been acknowledged or proved: PROVIDED, That deeds, contracts and mortgages of real estate described by lot and block and addition or plat, shall not be filed or recorded until the plat of such addition has been filed and made a matter of record: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the auditor or recording officer may delay recording an instrument conveying real property as provided in section 1 of this act;(2) Patents to lands and receivers' receipts, whether for mineral, timber, homestead or preemption claims or cash entries;(3) All such other papers or writing as are required by law to be recorded and such as are required by law to be filed.Sec. 3. RCW 36.22.185 and 2025 c 100 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Beginning January 1, 2024, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the county auditor must collect a covenant homeownership program assessment of $100 for each document recorded, which is in addition to any other charge, surcharge, or assessment allowed by law. The county auditor may retain up to one percent of the moneys for collection of the assessment and must remit the remainder of the moneys to the state treasurer to be deposited in the covenant homeownership account created in RCW 43.181.020.(2) The assessment imposed in this section does not apply to: (a) Documents recording a birth, marriage, divorce, or death; (b) any recorded documents otherwise exempted from a recording fee or additional assessments under state law; (c) marriage licenses issued by the county auditor; (d) documents recording a name change order under RCW 4.24.130; ((or)) (e) documents recording a federal, state, county, city, or water-sewer district, or wage lien or satisfaction of lien; or (f) fraud protection instruments and release of fraud protection instruments recorded as part of the voluntary property title protection program pursuant to section 1 of this act.Sec. 4. RCW 36.22.240 and 2021 c 214 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a surcharge of two dollars and fifty cents shall be charged by the county auditor for each document recorded, which will be in addition to any other charge or surcharge allowed by law. The auditor shall remit the funds to the state treasurer to be deposited and used as follows:(a) Through June 30, 2024, funds must be deposited into the growth management planning and environmental review fund created in RCW 36.70A.490 to be used first for grants for costs associated with RCW 36.70A.600 and for costs associated with RCW 36.70A.610, and thereafter for any allowable use of the fund.(b) Beginning July 1, 2024, sufficient funds must be deposited into the growth management planning and environmental review fund created in RCW 36.70A.490 for costs associated with RCW 36.70A.610, and the remainder deposited into the home security fund account created in RCW 43.185C.060 to be used for maintenance and operation costs of: (i) Permanent supportive housing and (ii) affordable housing for very low-income and extremely low-income households. Funds may only be expended in cities that have taken action under RCW 36.70A.600.(2) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to: (a) Assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust; (b) documents recording a birth, marriage, divorce, or death; (c) any recorded documents otherwise exempted from a recording fee or additional surcharges under state law; (d) marriage licenses issued by the county auditor; ((or)) (e) documents recording a federal, state, county, city, or water-sewer district, or wage lien or satisfaction of lien; or (f) fraud protection instruments and release of fraud protection instruments recorded as part of the voluntary property title protection program pursuant to section 1 of this act.(3) For purposes of this section, the terms "permanent supportive housing," "affordable housing," "very low-income households," and "extremely low-income households" have the same meaning as provided in RCW 36.70A.030.Sec. 5. RCW 36.22.250 and 2025 c 408 s 3, 2025 c 100 s 2, and 2025 c 74 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) A surcharge of $183 per instrument shall be charged by the county auditor for each document recorded, which will be in addition to any other charge authorized by law. The following are exempt from this surcharge:(a) Documents recording a birth, marriage, divorce, or death;(b) Any recorded documents otherwise exempted from a recording fee or additional surcharges under state law;(c) Marriage licenses issued by the county auditor; ((and))(d) Documents recording a federal, state, county, city, or water-sewer district, or wage lien or satisfaction of lien; and(e) Fraud protection instruments and release of fraud protection instruments recorded as part of the voluntary property title protection program pursuant to section 1 of this act.(2) Funds collected pursuant to this section must be distributed and used as follows:(a) One percent of the total funds collected shall be retained by the county auditor for its fee collection activities;(b) 30 percent of the total funds collected shall be retained by the county and used by the county as provided in subsection (3) of this section;(c) 54.1 percent of the total funds collected shall be transmitted to the state treasurer to be deposited in the home security fund account created in RCW 43.185C.060 and shall be used by the department of commerce as provided in subsection (4) of this section;(d) 13.1 percent of the total funds collected shall be transmitted to the state treasurer to be deposited in the affordable housing for all account created in RCW 43.185C.190 and shall be used by the department of commerce as provided in subsection (5) of this section;(e) 1.8 percent of the total funds collected shall be transmitted to the state treasurer to be deposited in the landlord mitigation program account created in RCW 43.31.615 and shall be used by the department of commerce as provided in subsection (6) of this section.(3) The county shall use their portion of the collected funds as follows:(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, up to 10 percent for the county's administration and local distribution of the funds collected from the surcharge in this section, and administrative costs related to the county's homeless housing plan;(b)(i) At least 75 percent will be retained and used by the county to accomplish the purposes of its local homeless housing plan pursuant to chapter 484, Laws of 2005, unless a city in the county elects, as authorized in RCW 43.185C.080, to operate its own local homeless housing program.(ii) If a city in the county elects, as authorized in RCW 43.185C.080, to operate its own local homeless housing program, the 10 percent for administrative costs retained under (a) of this subsection and the 75 percent for local homeless housing plans retained under (b) of this subsection must be combined and distributed as follows: For each city in the county that elects as authorized in RCW 43.185C.080 to operate its own local homeless housing program, a percentage of the surcharge assessed under this subsection equal to the percentage of the city's local portion of the real estate excise tax collected by the county shall be transmitted at least quarterly to the city treasurer, without any deduction for county administrative costs, for use by the city for program costs which directly contribute to the goals of the city's local homeless housing plan. Each county or city receiving funds under this subsection (3) may use up to 10 percent of their share of the total funding retained or received under this subsection (3) after the completion of the required city distributions for costs related to:(A) The county's administration and local distribution of the funds collected from the surcharge in this section;(B) Administrative costs related to the county's homeless housing plan; and(C) Administrative costs related to the city's homeless housing program;(c) At least 15 percent will be retained and used by the county for eligible housing activities, as described in this subsection, that serve extremely low and very low-income households in the county and the cities within a county according to an interlocal agreement between the county and the cities within the county consistent with countywide and local housing needs and policies. A priority must be given to eligible housing activities that serve extremely low-income households with incomes at or below 30 percent of the area median income. Eligible housing activities to be funded are limited to:(i) Acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation of housing projects or units within housing projects that are affordable to very low-income households with incomes at or below 50 percent of the area median income, including units for homeownership, rental units, seasonal and permanent farmworker housing units, units reserved for victims of human trafficking and their families, and single room occupancy units;(ii) Supporting building operation and maintenance costs of housing projects or units within housing projects eligible to receive housing trust funds, that are affordable to very low-income households with incomes at or below 50 percent of the area median income, and that require a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing operating expenses;(iii) Rental assistance vouchers for housing units that are affordable to very low-income households with incomes at or below 50 percent of the area median income, including rental housing vouchers for victims of human trafficking and their families, to be administered by a local public housing authority or other local organization that has an existing rental assistance voucher program, consistent with or similar to the United States department of housing and urban development's section 8 rental assistance voucher program standards; and(iv) Operating costs for emergency shelters and licensed overnight youth shelters.(4) The department of commerce shall use the funds from the document recording fee or other fund sources deposited in the home security fund account as follows, except that the department of commerce shall provide counties with the right of first refusal to receive grant funds distributed under (b) of this subsection (4). If a county refuses the funds or does not respond within a time frame established by the department, the department shall make good faith efforts to identify one or more suitable alternative grantees operating within that county. The alternative grantee shall distribute the funds in a manner that is in compliance with this chapter. Funding provided through the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs created in RCW 43.330.705 is exempt from the county first refusal requirement.(a) Up to 10 percent for administration of the programs established in chapter 43.185C RCW and in conformance with this subsection (4), including the costs of creating and implementing strategic plans, collecting and evaluating data, measuring and reporting performance, providing technical assistance to local governments, providing training to entities delivering services, and developing and maintaining stakeholder relationships;(b) At least 90 percent for homelessness assistance grant programs administered by the department, including but not limited to: Temporary rental assistance; eviction prevention rental assistance per RCW 43.185C.185; emergency shelter and transitional housing operations and maintenance; outreach; diversion; HOPE and crisis residential centers; young adult housing; homeless services and case management for adult, family, youth, and young adult homeless populations and those at risk of homelessness; project-based vouchers for nonprofit housing providers or public housing authorities; tenant-based rent assistance; housing services; direct cash assistance as provided for in RCW 43.185C.220(5)(a); rapid rehousing; emergency housing; acquisition; operations; maintenance; and service costs for permanent supportive housing as defined in RCW 36.70A.030 for individuals with disabilities. Grantees may also use these funds in partnership with permanent supportive housing programs administered by the office of apple health and homes created in RCW 43.330.181. Priority for use must be given to purposes intended to house persons who are chronically homeless or to maintain housing for individuals with disabilities and prior experiences of homelessness, including families with children.(5) The department of commerce shall use the funds from the document recording fee or other fund sources deposited in the affordable housing for all account as follows:(a) Up to 10 percent for program administration and technical assistance necessary for the delivery programs and activities under this subsection (5);(b) At least 90 percent for the following:(i) Grants for building operation and maintenance costs of housing projects, or units within housing projects, that are in the state's housing trust fund portfolio, are affordable to extremely low-income households with incomes at or below 30 percent of the area median income, and require a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing operating expenses;(ii) Grants to support the building operations, maintenance, and supportive service costs for permanent supportive housing projects, or units within housing projects, that have received or will receive funding from the housing trust fund or other public capital funding programs. The supported projects or units must be dedicated as permanent supportive housing as defined in RCW 36.70A.030, be occupied by extremely low-income households with incomes at or below 30 percent of the area median income, and require a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing property operations, maintenance, and supportive services expenses.(6) The department of commerce shall use the funds from the document recording fee or other fund sources deposited in the landlord mitigation program account to administer the landlord mitigation program as established in RCW 43.31.605. The department of commerce may use up to 10 percent of these funds for program administration and the development and maintenance of a database necessary to administer the program.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---